North Carolina, session 2025, SB686.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-7.41(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) A person who is convicted of a firearm-related felony and is also convicted of the
status offense must, upon conviction or plea of guilty under indictment as provided in this Article,
be sentenced as a Class C felon (except where the felon has been sentenced as a Class A, B1, or
B2 felon). However, in no case shall the person receive a minimum term of imprisonment of less
than 120 months. The court may not suspend the sentence and may not place the person sentenced
on probation."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-179 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-179. Sentencing hearing after conviction for impaired driving; determination of
grossly aggravating and aggravating and mitigating factors; punishments.
…
(f3) Aggravated Level One Punishment. – A defendant subject to Aggravated Level One
punishment may be fined up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and shall be sentenced to a term
of imprisonment that includes a minimum term of not less than 12 months and a maximum term
of not more than 36 months. Notwithstanding G.S. 15A-1371, a defendant sentenced to a term
of imprisonment pursuant to this subsection shall not be eligible for parole. However, the
defendant shall be released from the Statewide Misdemeanant Confinement Program on the date
equivalent to the defendant's maximum imposed term of imprisonment less four months and shall
be supervised by the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry under and subject to the
provisions of Article 84A of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes and shall also be required to
abstain from alcohol consumption for the four-month period of supervision as verified by a
continuous alcohol monitoring system. For purposes of revocation, violation of the requirement
to abstain from alcohol or comply with the use of a continuous alcohol monitoring system shall
be deemed a controlling condition under G.S. 15A-1368.4.
The term of imprisonment may be suspended only if a condition of special probation is
imposed to require the defendant to serve a term of imprisonment of at least 120 days. If the
defendant is placed on probation, the judge shall impose as requirements that the defendant (i)
abstain from alcohol consumption for a minimum of 120 days to a maximum of the term of
probation, as verified by a continuous alcohol monitoring system pursuant to subsection (h1) of
this section, and (ii) obtain a substance abuse assessment and the education or treatment required
by G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of a drivers license and as a condition of probation. The judge
may impose any other lawful condition of probation.
*S686-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) Level One Punishment. – A defendant subject to Level One punishment may be fined
up to four thousand dollars ($4,000) and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment that
includes a minimum term of not less than 30 days and a maximum term of not more than 24
months. The term of imprisonment may be suspended only if a condition of special probation is
imposed to require the defendant to serve a term of imprisonment of at least 30 days. A judge
may reduce the minimum term of imprisonment required to a term of not less than 10 days if a
condition of special probation is imposed to require that a defendant abstain from alcohol
consumption and be monitored by a continuous alcohol monitoring system, of a type approved
by the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction,
for a period of not less than 120 days. If the defendant is monitored on an approved continuous
alcohol monitoring system during the pretrial period, up to 60 days of pretrial monitoring may
be credited against the 120-day monitoring requirement for probation. If the defendant is placed
on probation, the judge shall impose a requirement that the defendant obtain a substance abuse
assessment and the education or treatment required by G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of a drivers
license and as a condition of probation. The judge may impose any other lawful condition of
probation.
(h) Level Two Punishment. – A defendant subject to Level Two punishment may be fined
up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment that
includes a minimum term of not less than seven days and a maximum term of not more than 12
months. The term of imprisonment may be suspended only if a condition of special probation is
imposed to require the defendant to serve a term of imprisonment of at least seven days or to
abstain from consuming alcohol for at least 90 consecutive days, as verified by a continuous
alcohol monitoring system, of a type approved by the Division of Community Supervision and
Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction. If the defendant is subject to Level Two
punishment based on a finding that the grossly aggravating factor in subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection (c) of this section applies, the conviction for a prior offense involving impaired driving
occurred within five years before the date of the offense for which the defendant is being
sentenced and the judge suspends all active terms of imprisonment and imposes abstention from
alcohol as verified by a continuous alcohol monitory system, then the judge must also impose as
an additional condition of special probation that the defendant must complete 240 hours of
community service. If the defendant is monitored on an approved continuous alcohol monitoring
system during the pretrial period, up to 60 days of pretrial monitoring may be credited against
the 90-day monitoring requirement for probation. If the defendant is placed on probation, the
judge shall impose a requirement that the defendant obtain a substance abuse assessment and the
education or treatment required by G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of a drivers license and as a
condition of probation. The judge may impose any other lawful condition of probation.
…
(i) Level Three Punishment. – A defendant subject to Level Three punishment may be
fined up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment that
includes a minimum term of not less than 72 hours and a maximum term of not more than six
months. The term of imprisonment may be suspended. However, the suspended sentence shall
include the condition that the defendant:
(1) Be imprisoned for a term of at least 72 hours as a condition of special
probation; or
(2) Perform community service for a term of at least 72 hours; or
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-253, s. 23, effective December 1, 2006, and
applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.
(4) Any combination of these conditions.
If the defendant is placed on probation, the judge shall impose a requirement that the
defendant obtain a substance abuse assessment and the education or treatment required by
Page 2 Senate Bill 686-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of a drivers license and as a condition of probation. The judge
may impose any other lawful condition of probation.
(j) Level Four Punishment. – A defendant subject to Level Four punishment may be
fined up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment that
includes a minimum term of not less than 48 hours and a maximum term of not more than 120
days. The term of imprisonment may be suspended. However, the suspended sentence shall
include the condition that the defendant:
(1) Be imprisoned for a term of 48 hours as a condition of special probation; or
(2) Perform community service for a term of 48 hours; or
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-253, s. 23, effective December 1, 2006, and
applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.
(4) Any combination of these conditions.
If the defendant is placed on probation, the judge shall impose a requirement that the
defendant obtain a substance abuse assessment and the education or treatment required by
G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of a drivers license and as a condition of probation. The judge
may impose any other lawful condition of probation.
(k) Level Five Punishment. – A defendant subject to Level Five punishment may be fined
up to two hundred dollars ($200.00) and shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment that
includes a minimum term of not less than 24 hours and a maximum term of not more than 60
days. The term of imprisonment may be suspended. However, the suspended sentence shall
include the condition that the defendant:
(1) Be imprisoned for a term of 24 hours as a condition of special probation; or
(2) Perform community service for a term of 24 hours; or
(3) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-253, s. 23, effective December 1, 2006, and
applicable to offenses committed on or after that date.
(4) Any combination of these conditions.
If the defendant is placed on probation, the judge shall impose a requirement that the
defendant obtain a substance abuse assessment and the education or treatment required by
G.S. 20-17.6 for the restoration of a drivers license and as a condition of probation. The judge
may impose any other lawful condition of probation.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 90-95(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following provisions apply except as
otherwise provided in this Article:
(1) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses in
excess of 10 pounds (avoirdupois) of marijuana shall be guilty of a felony
which felony shall be known as "trafficking in marijuana" and if the quantity
of such substance involved:
a. Is in excess of 10 pounds, but less than 50 pounds, such person shall
be punished as a Class H felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum
term of 25 months and a maximum term of 39 months in the State's
prison and shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000);
b. Is 50 pounds or more, but less than 2,000 pounds, such person shall be
punished as a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 35 months and a maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);
c. Is 2,000 pounds or more, but less than 10,000 pounds, such person
shall be punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a
minimum term of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the
State's prison and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000);
Senate Bill 686-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Is 10,000 pounds or more, such person shall be punished as a Class D
felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 175 months and a
maximum term of 222 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
not less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
(1a) For the purpose of this subsection, a "dosage unit" shall consist of 3 grams of
synthetic cannabinoid or any mixture containing such substance. Any person
who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses in excess of 50
dosage units of a synthetic cannabinoid or any mixture containing such
substance, shall be guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as
"trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids," and if the quantity of such substance
involved:
a. Is in excess of 50 dosage units, but less than 250 dosage units, such
person shall be punished as a Class H felon and shall be sentenced to
a minimum term of 25 months and a maximum term of 39 months in
the State's prison and shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars
($5,000);
b. Is 250 dosage units or more, but less than 1250 dosage units, such
person shall be punished as a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to
a minimum term of 35 months and a maximum term of 51 months in
the State's prison and shall be fined not less than twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000);
c. Is 1250 dosage units or more, but less than 3750 dosage units, such
person shall be punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a
minimum term of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the
State's prison and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars
($50,000);
d. Is 3750 dosage units or more, such person shall be punished as a Class
D felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 175 months and
a maximum term of 222 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
not less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).
(2) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 1,000
tablets, capsules or other dosage units, or the equivalent quantity, or more of
methaqualone, or any mixture containing such substance, shall be guilty of a
felony which felony shall be known as "trafficking in methaqualone" and if
the quantity of such substance or mixture involved:
a. Is 1,000 or more dosage units, or equivalent quantity, but less than
5,000 dosage units, or equivalent quantity, such person shall be
punished as a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 35 months and a maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);
b. Is 5,000 or more dosage units, or equivalent quantity, but less than
10,000 dosage units, or equivalent quantity, such person shall be
punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
c. Is 10,000 or more dosage units, or equivalent quantity, such person
shall be punished as a Class D felon and shall be sentenced to a
minimum term of 175 months and a maximum term of 222 months in
the State's prison and shall be fined not less than two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000).
Page 4 Senate Bill 686-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 28
grams or more of cocaine and any salt, isomer (whether optical or geometric),
salts of isomers, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof, or any coca
leaves and any salt, isomer, salts of isomers, compound, derivative, or
preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, isomer, salts of isomers, compound,
derivative or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical
with any of these substances (except decocainized coca leaves or any
extraction of coca leaves which does not contain cocaine) or any mixture
containing such substances, shall be guilty of a felony, which felony shall be
known as "trafficking in cocaine" and if the quantity of such substance or
mixture involved:
a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 35 months and a maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
b. Is 200 grams or more, but less than 400 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000);
c. Is 400 grams or more, such person shall be punished as a Class D felon
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 175 months and a
maximum term of 222 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(3a) Repealed by Session Laws 1999-370, s. 1, effective December 1, 1999.
(3b) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 28
grams or more of methamphetamine or any mixture containing such substance
shall be guilty of a felony which felony shall be known as "trafficking in
methamphetamine" and if the quantity of such substance or mixture involved:
a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
b. Is 200 grams or more, but less than 400 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class E felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 90 months and a maximum term of 120 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000);
c. Is 400 grams or more, such person shall be punished as a Class C felon
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 225 months and a
maximum term of 282 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(3c) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 28
grams or more of amphetamine or any mixture containing such substance shall
be guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as "trafficking in
amphetamine", and if the quantity of such substance or mixture involved:
a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class H felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 25 months and a maximum term of 39 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000);
Senate Bill 686-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Is 200 grams or more, but less than 400 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 35 months and a maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);
c. Is 400 grams or more, such person shall be punished as a Class E felon
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 90 months and a
maximum term of 120 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(3d) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 28
grams or more of any substituted cathinone, as defined in G.S. 90-89(5)(j), or
any mixture containing such substance shall be guilty of a felony, which
felony shall be known as "trafficking in substituted cathinones," and if the
quantity of such substance or mixture involved:
a. Is 28 grams or more, but less than 200 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
b. Is 200 grams or more, but less than 400 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class E felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 90 months and a maximum term of 120 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000);
c. Is 400 grams or more, such person shall be punished as a Class C felon
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 225 months and a
maximum term of 282 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(3e) Repealed by Session Laws 2018-44, s. 7, effective December 1, 2018.
(4) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses four
grams or more of opium, opiate, or opioid, or any salt, compound, derivative,
or preparation of opium, opiate, or opioid (except apomorphine, nalbuphine,
analoxone and naltrexone and their respective salts), including heroin, or any
mixture containing such substance, shall be guilty of a felony which felony
shall be known as "trafficking in opium, opiate, opioid, or heroin" and if the
quantity of such controlled substance or mixture involved:
a. Is four grams or more, but less than 14 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 70 months and a maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined as follows:
1. A fine of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) if the
controlled substance is heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, or any
salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof, or any
mixture containing any of these substances.
2. A fine of not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any
controlled substance described in this subdivision and not
otherwise subject to sub-sub-subdivision 1. of this
sub-subdivision.
b. Is 14 grams or more, but less than 28 grams, such person shall be
punished as a Class E felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term
of 90 months and a maximum term of 120 months in the State's prison
and shall be fined as follows:
Page 6 Senate Bill 686-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
1. A fine of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) if
the controlled substance is heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, or
any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation thereof, or any
mixture containing any of these substances.
2. A fine of not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) for any controlled substance described in this
subdivision and not otherwise subject to sub-sub-subdivision
1. of this sub-subdivision.
c. Is 28 grams or more, such person shall be punished as a Class C felon
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 225 months and a
maximum term of 282 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
as follows:
1. A fine of one million dollars ($1,000,000) if the controlled
substance is heroin, fentanyl, or carfentanil, or any salt,
compound, derivative, or preparation thereof, or any mixture
containing any of these substances.
2. A fine of not less than five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) for any controlled substance described in this
subdivision and not otherwise subject to sub-sub-subdivision
1. of this sub-subdivision.
(4a) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 100
tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, or the equivalent quantity, or more, of
Lysergic Acid Diethylamide, or any mixture containing such substance, shall
be guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as "trafficking in Lysergic
Acid Diethylamide". If the quantity of such substance or mixture involved:
a. Is 100 or more dosage units, or equivalent quantity, but less than 500
dosage units, or equivalent quantity, such person shall be punished as
a Class G felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 35
months and a maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison and
shall be fined not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);
b. Is 500 or more dosage units, or equivalent quantity, but less than 1,000
dosage units, or equivalent quantity, such person shall be punished as
a Class F felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 70 months
and a maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison and shall be
fined not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
c. Is 1,000 or more dosage units, or equivalent quantity, such person shall
be punished as a Class D felon and shall be sentenced to a minimum
term of 175 months and a maximum term of 222 months in the State's
prison and shall be fined not less than two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000).
(4b) Any person who sells, manufactures, delivers, transports, or possesses 100 or
more tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, or 28 grams or more of
3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (MDA), including its salts, isomers, and
salts of isomers, or 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA),
including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, or any mixture containing
such substances, shall be guilty of a felony, which felony shall be known as
"trafficking in MDA/MDMA." If the quantity of the substance or mixture
involved:
a. Is 100 or more tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, but less than
500 tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, or 28 grams or more, but
less than 200 grams, the person shall be punished as a Class G felon
Senate Bill 686-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 35 months and a
maximum term of 51 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000);
b. Is 500 or more tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, but less than
1,000 tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, or 200 grams or more,
but less than 400 grams, the person shall be punished as a Class F felon
and shall be sentenced to a minimum term of 70 months and a
maximum term of 93 months in the State's prison and shall be fined
not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000);
c. Is 1,000 or more tablets, capsules, or other dosage units, or 400 grams
or more, the person shall be punished as a Class D felon and shall be
sentenced to a minimum term of 175 months and a maximum term of
222 months in the State's prison and shall be fined not less than two
hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(5) Except as provided in this subdivision or subdivision (5a) of this subsection,
a person being sentenced under this subsection may not receive a suspended
sentence or be placed on probation. The sentencing judge may reduce the fine,
or impose a prison term less than the applicable minimum prison term
provided by this subsection, or suspend the prison term imposed and place a
person on probation when such person has, to the best of the person's
knowledge, provided substantial assistance in the identification, arrest, or
conviction of any accomplices, accessories, co-conspirators, or principals if
the sentencing judge enters in the record a finding that the person to be
sentenced has rendered such substantial assistance.
(5a) A judge sentencing a person for a conviction pursuant to G.S. 90-95(h) or
G.S. 90-95(i) for conspiracy to commit a violation of G.S. 90-95(h) shall
impose the applicable minimum prison term provided by this subsection. The
sentencing judge may reduce the fine and sentence the person consistent with
the applicable offense classification and prior record level provided in
G.S. 15A-1340.17, if after a hearing and an opportunity for the district
attorney to present evidence, including evidence from the investigating law
enforcement officer, other law enforcement officers, or witnesses with
knowledge of the defendant's conduct at any time prior to sentencing, the
judge enters into the record specific findings that all of the following are met:
a. The defendant has accepted responsibility for the defendant's criminal
conduct.
b. The defendant has not previously been convicted of a felony under
G.S. 90-95.
c. The defendant did not use violence or a credible threat of violence, or
possess a firearm or other dangerous weapon, in the commission of the
offense for which the defendant is being sentenced.
d. The defendant did not use violence or a credible threat of violence, or
possess a firearm or other dangerous weapon, in the commission of
any other violation of law.
e. The defendant has admitted that he or she has a substance abuse
disorder involving a controlled substance and has successfully
completed a treatment program approved by the Court to address the
substance abuse disorder.
f. Imposition of the mandatory minimum prison term would result in
substantial injustice.
Page 8 Senate Bill 686-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
g. Imposition of the mandatory minimum prison sentence is not
necessary for the protection of the public.
h. The defendant is being sentenced solely for trafficking, or conspiracy
to commit trafficking, as a result of possession of a controlled
substance.
i. There is no substantial evidence that the defendant has ever engaged
in the transport for purpose of sale, sale, manufacture, or delivery of a
controlled substance or the intent to transport for purpose of sale, sell,
manufacture, or deliver a controlled substance.
j. The defendant, to the best of his or her knowledge, has provided all
reasonable assistance in the identification, arrest, or conviction of any
accomplices, accessories, co-conspirators, or principals.
k. The defendant is being sentenced for trafficking, or conspiracy to
commit trafficking, for possession of an amount of a controlled
substance that is not of a quantity greater than the lowest category for
which a defendant may be convicted for trafficking of that controlled
substance under G.S. 90-95(h).
(6) Sentences imposed pursuant to this subsection shallmay run consecutively
with and shall commence at the expiration of any sentence being served by
the person sentenced hereunder.
…."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Senate Bill 686-First Edition Page 9